Wyoming, session 2026, SF0025.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-1-302(h) is amended to read:

23-1-302. Powers and duties.

(h) For purposes of promoting the maintenance of
wildlife habitat and attaining wildlife management
objectives pursuant to W.S. 23-1-103 and in addition to
duties prescribed under paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section,
SF0025

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0192
the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations
governing the issuance of elk, deer, antelope and turkey
hunting licenses to Wyoming landowners without subjection
to prescribed means of competitive public issuance. Fees
assessed for licenses authorized under this subsection
shall be equal to fees prescribed under W.S. 23-2-101(j)
for each species for which the license is issued. The
commission may promulgate rules to limit the number of
landowner licenses issued pursuant to this subsection in
any limited quota hunt area.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0025